North Carolina statutes. Chapter 47C. North Carolina Condominium Act.
Article 3. Management of the Condominium.
§ 47C-3-115.
Assessments for common expense.

Until the association makes a common expense assessment, the declarant shall pay all the common expenses. After any assessment has been made by the association, assessments thereafter must be made at least annually by the association.

Except for assessments under subsections (c), (d), and (e), all common expenses must be assessed against all the units in accordance with the allocations set forth in the declaration pursuant to G.S. 47C-2-107(a). Any past due common expense assessment
or installment thereof bears interest at the rate established by the association not exceeding eighteen percent (18%) per year.

To the extent required by the declaration:

Any common expense associated with the maintenance, repair, or replacement of a limited common element must be assessed against the units to which that limited common element is assigned, equally, or in any other proportion that the declaration provides;

Any common expense or portion thereof benefiting fewer than all of the units must be assessed exclusively against the units benefited; and

The costs of insurance must be assessed in proportion to risk and the costs of utilities must be assessed in proportion to usage.

Assessments to pay a judgment against the association (G.S. 47C-3-117(a)) may be made only against the units in the condominium at the time the judgment was entered, in proportion to their common expense liabilities.

If any common expense is caused by the misconduct of any unit owner or occupant, the association may assess that expense exclusively against the unit of that owner or occupant.

If common expense liabilities are reallocated, common expense assessments and any installment thereof not yet due shall be recalculated in accordance with the reallocated common expense liabilities.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 2020-52, s. 10.

§ 47C-3-116.
Lien for sums due the association; enforcement.

Any assessment attributable to a unit which remains unpaid for a period of 30 days or longer shall constitute a lien on that unit when a claim of lien is filed of record in the office of the clerk of superior court of the county in which the unit is located
in the manner provided in this section. Once filed, a claim of lien secures all sums due the association through the date filed and any sums due to the association thereafter. Unless the declaration provides otherwise, fees, charges,
late charges and other charges imposed pursuant to

G.S. 47C-3-102

, 47C-3-107, 47C-3-107.1, and 47C-3-115 are subject to the claim of lien under this section as well as any other sums due and payable to the association under the declaration, the provisions of this Chapter, or as
the result of an arbitration, mediation, or judicial decision.

The association must make reasonable and diligent efforts to ensure that its records contain the unit owner’s current mailing address. No fewer than 15 days prior to filing the lien, the association shall mail a statement of the assessment amount due
by first-class mail to the physical address of the unit and the unit owner’s address of record with the association and, if different, to the address for the unit owner shown on the county tax records for the unit. If the unit
owner is a corporation or limited liability company, the statement shall also be sent by first-class mail to the mailing address of the registered agent for the corporation or limited liability company. Notwithstanding anything
to the contrary in this Chapter, the association is not required to mail a statement to an address known to be a vacant unit or to a unit for which there is no United States postal address.

A claim of lien shall set forth the name and address of the association, the name of the record owner of the unit at the time the claim of lien is filed, a description of the unit, and the amount of the lien claimed. A claim of lien may also appoint a
trustee to conduct a foreclosure as provided in subsection (f) of this section. The first page of the claim of lien shall contain the following statement in print that is in boldface, capital letters, and no smaller than the largest
print used elsewhere in the document:

“THIS DOCUMENT CONSTITUTES A LIEN AGAINST YOUR PROPERTY, AND IF THE LIEN IS NOT PAID, THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY PROCEED WITH FORECLOSURE AGAINST YOUR PROPERTY IN LIKE MANNER AS A MORTGAGE UNDER NORTH CAROLINA LAW.”

The person signing the claim of lien on behalf of the association shall attach to and file with the claim of lien a certificate of service attesting to the attempt of service on the record owner, which service shall be attempted in accordance with

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4(j), for service of a copy of a summons and a complaint. If the actual service is not achieved, the person signing the claim of lien on behalf of the association shall be deemed to have met the requirements
of this subsection if service has been attempted pursuant to both of the following: (i)

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4(j)(1)c, d, or e and (ii) by mailing a copy of the lien by regular, first-class mail, postage prepaid to the physical address of the unit and the unit owner’s address of record with the association,
and, if different, to the address for the unit owner shown on the county tax records and the county real property records for the unit. In the event that the owner of record is not a natural person, and actual service is not
achieved, the person signing the claim of lien on behalf of the association shall be deemed to have met the requirements of this subsection if service has been attempted once pursuant to the applicable provisions of G.S. 1A-1,
Rule 4(j)(3) through G.S. 1A-1, Rule 4(j)(9). Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Chapter, the association is not required to mail a claim of lien to an address which is known to be a vacant unit or to a unit for
which there is no United States postal address. A lien for unpaid assessments is extinguished unless proceedings to enforce the lien are instituted within three years after the filing of the claim of lien in the office of the
clerk of superior court.

A claim of lien filed under this section is prior to all liens and encumbrances on a unit except (i) liens and encumbrances, specifically including, but not limited to, a mortgage or deed of trust on the unit, recorded before the filing of the claim of
lien in the office of the clerk of superior court and (ii) liens for real estate taxes and other governmental assessments and charges against the unit. This subsection does not affect the priority of mechanics’ or materialmen’s
liens.

The association shall be entitled to recover the reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs it incurs in connection with the collection of any sums due. A unit owner may not be required to pay attorneys’ fees and court costs until the unit owner is notified
in writing of the association’s intent to seek payment of attorneys’ fees, costs, and expenses. The notice must be sent by first-class mail to the physical address of the unit and the unit owner’s address of record with the association
and, if different, to the address for the unit owner shown on the county tax records for the unit. The association must make reasonable and diligent efforts to ensure that its records contain the unit owner’s current mailing address.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Chapter, there shall be no requirement that notice under this subsection be mailed to an address which is known to be a vacant unit or a unit for which there is no United States
postal address. The notice shall set out the outstanding balance due as of the date of the notice and state that the unit owner has 15 days from the mailing of the notice by first-class mail to pay the outstanding balance without
the attorneys’ fees and court costs. If the unit owner pays the outstanding balance within this period, then the unit owner shall have no obligation to pay attorneys’ fees, costs, or expenses. The notice shall also inform the unit
owner of the opportunity to contact a representative of the association to discuss a payment schedule for the outstanding balance as provided in subsection (i) of this section and shall provide the name and telephone number of
the representative.

Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, the association, acting through the executive board, may foreclose a claim of lien in like manner as a mortgage or deed of trust on real estate under power of sale, as provided in Article 2A of Chapter
45 of the General Statutes, if the assessment remains unpaid for 90 days or more. The association shall not foreclose the claim of lien unless the executive board votes to commence the proceeding against the specific unit. The
following provisions and procedures shall be applicable to and complied with in every nonjudicial power of sale foreclosure of a claim of lien, and these provisions and procedures shall control to the extent they are inconsistent
or in conflict with the provisions of Article 2A of Chapter 45 of the General Statutes:

The association shall be deemed to have a power of sale for purposes of enforcement of its claim of lien.

The terms “mortgagee” and “holder” as used in Article 2A of Chapter 45 of the General Statutes shall mean the association, except as provided otherwise in this Chapter.

The term “security instrument” as used in Article 2A of Chapter 45 of the General Statutes shall mean the claim of lien.

The term “trustee” as used in Article 2A of Chapter 45 of the General Statutes shall mean the person or entity appointed by the association under subdivision (6) of this subsection.

After the association has filed a claim of lien and prior to the commencement of a nonjudicial foreclosure, the association shall give to the unit owner notice of the association’s intention to commence a nonjudicial foreclosure to enforce its claim of
lien. The notice shall contain the information required in G.S. 45-21.16(c)(5a).

The association shall appoint a trustee to conduct the nonjudicial foreclosure proceeding and sale. The appointment of the trustee shall be included in the claim of lien or in a separate instrument filed with the office of the clerk of court in the county
in which the unit is located as an exhibit to the notice of hearing. The association, at its option, may from time to time remove a trustee previously appointed and appoint a successor trustee by filing a Substitution of
Trustee with the clerk of court in the foreclosure proceeding. Counsel for the association may be appointed by the association to serve as the trustee and may serve in that capacity as long as the unit owner does not contest
the obligation to pay the amount of any sums due the association, or the validity, enforcement, or foreclosure of the claim of lien as provided in subdivision (12) of this subsection. Any trustee appointed pursuant to this
subsection shall have the same fiduciary duties and obligations as a trustee in the foreclosure of a deed of trust.

If a valid debt, default, and notice to those entitled to receive notice under G.S. 45-21.16(b) are found to exist, then the clerk of court shall authorize the sale of the property described in the claim of lien by the trustee.

If, prior to the expiration of the upset bid period provided in

G.S. 45-21.27

, the unit owner satisfies the debt secured by the claim of lien and pays all expenses and costs incurred in filing and enforcing the association assessment lien, including, but not limited to, advertising
costs, attorneys’ fees, and the trustee’s commission, then the trustee shall dismiss the foreclosure action and the association shall cancel the claim of lien of record in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 45-36.3

. The unit owner shall have all rights granted under Article 4 of Chapter 45 of the General Statutes to ensure the association’s satisfaction of the claim of lien.

Any person, other than the trustee, may bid at the foreclosure sale. Unless prohibited in the declaration or bylaws, the association may bid on the unit at a foreclosure sale directly or through an agent. If the association or its agent is the high bidder
at the sale, the trustee shall allow the association to pay the costs and expenses of the sale and apply a credit against the sums due by the unit owner to the association in lieu of paying the bid price in full.

Upon the expiration of the upset bid period provided in

G.S. 45-21.27

, the trustee shall have full power and authority to execute a deed for the unit to the high bidder.

The trustee shall be entitled to a commission for services rendered which shall include fees, costs, and expenses reasonably incurred by the trustee in connection with the foreclosure whether or not a sale is held. Except as provided in subdivision (12)
of this subsection, the trustee’s commission shall be paid without regard to any limitations on compensation otherwise provided by law, including, without limitation, the provisions of

G.S. 45-21.15

.

If the unit owner does not contest the obligation to pay or the amount of any sums due the association or the validity, enforcement, or foreclosure of the claim of lien at any time after the expiration of the 15-day period following notice as required
in subsection (b) of this section, then attorneys’ fees and the trustee’s commission collectively charged to the unit owner shall not exceed one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200), not including costs or expenses incurred.
The obligation to pay and the amount of any sums due the association and the validity, enforcement, or foreclosure of the claim of lien remain uncontested as long as the unit owner does not dispute, contest, or raise any
objection, defense, offset, or counterclaim as to the amount or validity of any portion of the sums claimed due by the association or the validity, enforcement, or foreclosure of the claim of lien. Any judgment, decree,
or order in any action brought under this section shall include costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees for the prevailing party.

Unit owners shall be deemed to have the rights and remedies available to mortgagors under

G.S. 45-21.34

.

The provisions of subsection (f) of this section do not prohibit or prevent an association from pursuing judicial foreclosure of a claim of lien, from taking other actions to recover the sums due the association, or from accepting a deed in lieu of foreclosure.
Any judgment, decree, or order in any judicial foreclosure or civil action relating to the collection of assessments shall include an award of costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees for the prevailing party, which shall not be subject
to the limitation provided in subdivision (f)(12) of this section.

A claim of lien securing a debt consisting solely of fines imposed by the association, interest on unpaid fines, or attorneys’ fees incurred by the association solely associated with fines imposed by the association may only be enforced by judicial foreclosure,
as provided in Article 29A of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes. In addition, an association shall not levy, charge, or attempt to collect a service, collection, consulting, or administration fee from any unit owner unless the
fee is expressly allowed in the declaration, and any claim of lien securing a debt consisting solely of these fees may only be enforced by judicial foreclosure, as provided in Article 29A of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes.

The association, acting through its executive board and in the board’s sole discretion, may agree to allow payment of an outstanding balance in installments. Neither the association nor the unit owner is obligated to offer or accept any proposed installment
schedule. Reasonable administrative fees and costs for accepting and processing installments may be added to the outstanding balance and included in an installment payment schedule. Reasonable attorneys’ fees may be added to the
outstanding balance and included in an installment schedule after the unit owner has been given notice, as required in subsection (e) of this section. Attorneys’ fees incurred in connection with any request that the association
agrees to accept payment of all or any part of sums due in installments shall not be included or considered in the calculation of fees chargeable under subdivision (f)(12) of this section.

Where the holder of a first mortgage or first deed of trust of record or other purchaser of a unit obtains title to the unit as a result of foreclosure of a first mortgage or first deed of trust, the purchaser and its heirs, successors, and assigns shall
not be liable for the assessments against the unit which became due prior to the acquisition of title to the unit by the purchaser. The unpaid assessments shall be deemed to be common expenses collectible from all the unit owners,
including the purchaser, its heirs, successors, and assigns. For purposes of this subsection, the term “acquisition of title” means and refers to the recording of a deed conveying title or the time at which the rights of the parties
are fixed following the foreclosure of a mortgage or deed of trust, whichever occurs first.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 2005-422, s. 16; 2006-226, s. 14(a); 2009-515, s. 2; 2011-362, s. 2; 2013-202, s. 1.

§ 47C-3-116.1.
Validation of certain nonjudicial foreclosure proceedings and sales.

All nonjudicial foreclosure proceedings commenced by an association before October 1, 2013, and all sales and transfers of real property as part of those proceedings pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter, Chapter 47A of the General Statutes, or provisions
contained in the declaration of the condominium, are declared to be valid unless an action to set aside the foreclosure is commenced on or before October 1, 2013, or within one year after the date of the sale, whichever occurs last.

History.
2013-202, s. 2.

§ 47C-3-117.
Other liens affecting the condominium.

A judgment for money against the association is not a lien on the common elements, but if docketed is a lien in favor of the judgment lienholder against all of the units in the condominium at the time the judgment was entered. No other property of a unit
owner is subject to the claims of creditors of the association.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), if the association has granted a security interest in the common elements to a creditor of the association pursuant to

G.S. 47C-3-112

, the holder of that security interest must exercise its right against the common elements before its judgment lien on any unit may be enforced.

Whether perfected before or after the creation of the condominium, if a lien other than a deed of trust or mortgage, including a judgment lien or lien attributable to work performed or materials supplied before creation of the condominium, becomes effective
against two or more units, the unit owner of an affected unit may pay the lienholder the amount of the lien attributable to his unit, and the lienholder, upon receipt of payment, promptly shall deliver a release of the lien covering
that unit. The amount of the payment must be proportionate to the ratio which that unit owner’s common expense liability bears to the common expense liabilities of all unit owners whose units are subject to the lien. After payment,
the association may not assess or have a lien against that unit owner’s unit for any portion of the common expenses incurred in connection with that lien.

A judgment against the association shall be indexed in the name of the condominium and the association and, if so indexed, is notice of the lien against the units.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-3-118.
Association records.

The association shall keep financial records sufficiently detailed to enable the association to comply with this chapter. All financial and other records, including records of meetings of the association and executive board, shall be made reasonably available
for examination by any unit owner and the unit owner’s authorized agents as required by the bylaws and by Chapter 55A of the General Statutes if the association is a nonprofit corporation. If the bylaws do not specify particular
records to be maintained, the association shall keep accurate records of all cash receipts and expenditures and all assets and liabilities. In addition to any specific information that is required by the bylaws to be assembled
and reported to the unit owners at specified times, the association shall make an annual income and expense statement and balance sheet available to all unit owners at no charge and within 75 days after the close of the fiscal
year to which the information relates. Notwithstanding the bylaws, a more extensive compilation, review, or audit of the association’s books and records for the current or immediately preceding fiscal year may be required by a
vote of the majority of the executive board or by the affirmative vote of a majority of the unit owners present and voting in person or by proxy at any annual meeting or any special meeting duly called for that purpose.

The association, upon written request, shall furnish a unit owner or the unit owner’s authorized agents a statement setting forth the amount of unpaid assessments and other charges against a unit. The statement shall be furnished within 10 business days
after receipt of the request and is binding on the association, the executive board, and every unit owner. The association, its managers, or its agents may charge a reasonable fee for providing statements of unpaid assessments
and other charges, not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) per statement or request, and an additional expedite fee in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) if the request is made within 48 hours of closing.

In addition to the limitations of Article 8 of Chapter 55A of the General Statutes, no financial payments, including payments made in the form of goods and services, may be made to any officer or member of the association’s executive board or to a business,
business associate, or relative of an officer or member of the executive board, except as expressly provided for in the bylaws or in payments for services or expenses paid on behalf of the association which are approved in advance
by the executive board.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1; 2005-422, s. 17; 2020-90, s. 4(b).

§ 47C-3-119.
Association as trustee.

With respect to a third person dealing with the association in the association’s capacity as a trustee under

G.S. 47C-2-118

following termination or

G.S. 47C-3-113

for insurance proceeds, the existence of trust powers and their proper exercise by the association may be assumed without inquiry. A third person is not bound to inquire whether the association has power to act as trustee
or is properly exercising trust powers and a third person, without actual knowledge that the association is exceeding or improperly exercising its powers, is fully protected in dealing with the association as if it possessed and properly
exercised the powers it purports to exercise. A third person is not bound to assure the proper application of trust assets paid or delivered to the association in its capacity as such trustee.

History.
1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 877, s. 1.

§ 47C-3-120.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 47C-3-121.
American and State flags and political sign displays.

Notwithstanding any provision in any declaration of covenants, no restriction on the use of land shall be construed to:

Regulate or prohibit the display of the flag of the United States or North Carolina, of a size no greater than four feet by six feet, which is displayed in accordance with or in a manner consistent with the patriotic customs set forth in 4 U.S.C. §§ 5-10,
as amended, governing the display and use of the flag of the United States unless:

For restrictions registered prior to October 1, 2005, the restriction specifically uses the following terms:

Flag of the United States of America;

American flag;

United States flag; or

North Carolina flag.

For restrictions registered on or after October 1, 2005, the restriction shall be written on the first page of the instrument or conveyance in print that is in boldface type, capital letters, and no smaller than the largest print used elsewhere in the
instrument or conveyance. The restriction shall be construed to regulate or prohibit the display of the United States or North Carolina flag only if the restriction specifically states: “THIS DOCUMENT REGULATES OR PROHIBITS
THE DISPLAY OF THE FLAG OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA OR STATE OF NORTH CAROLINA”.

This subdivision shall apply to owners of property who display the flag of the United States or North Carolina on property owned exclusively by them and does not apply to common areas, easements, rights-of-way, or other areas owned by others.

Regulate or prohibit the indoor or outdoor display of a political sign by an association member on that member’s property owned exclusively by the member, unless:

For restrictions registered prior to October 1, 2005, the restriction specifically uses the term “political signs”.

For restrictions registered on or after October 1, 2005, the restriction shall be written on the first page of the instrument or conveyance in print that is in boldface type, capital letters, and no smaller than the largest print used elsewhere in the
instrument or conveyance. The restriction shall be construed to regulate or prohibit the display of political signs only if the restriction specifically states: “THIS DOCUMENT REGULATES OR PROHIBITS THE DISPLAY OF POLITICAL
SIGNS”.

Even when display of a political sign is permitted under this subdivision, an association (i) may prohibit the display of political signs earlier than 45 days before the day of the election and later than seven days after an election day, and (ii) may
regulate the size and number of political signs that may be placed on a member’s property if the association’s regulation is no more restrictive than any applicable city, town, or county ordinance that regulates the
size and number of political signs on residential property. If the local government in which the property is located does not regulate the size and number of political signs on residential property, the association
shall permit at least one political sign with the maximum dimensions of 24 inches by 24 inches on a member’s property. For the purposes of this subdivision, “political sign” means a sign that attempts to influence the
outcome of an election, including supporting or opposing an issue on the election ballot. This subdivision shall apply to owners of property who display political signs on property owned exclusively by them and does
not apply to common areas, easements, rights-of-way, or other areas owned by others.

History.
2005-422, s. 18; 2006-226, s. 14(b).

§ 47C-3-122.
Irrigation of landscaping.

Notwithstanding any provision in any declaration of covenants, no requirement to irrigate landscaping shall be construed to:

Require the irrigation of landscaping, during any period in which the U.S. Drought Monitor, as defined in

G.S. 143-350

, or the Secretary of Environmental Quality has designated an area in which the association is located as an area of severe, extreme, or exceptional drought and the Governor, a State agency, or unit of local government
has imposed water conservation measures applicable to the area unless:

For covenants registered prior to October 1, 2008, the covenant specifically requires the irrigation of landscaping notwithstanding water conservation measures imposed by the Governor, a State agency, or unit of local government. The association may not
fine or otherwise penalize an owner of land for violation of an irrigation requirement during a period of drought as designated under this subdivision, unless the covenant specifically authorizes fines or other penalties.

For covenants registered on or after October 1, 2008, the covenant must specifically state that any requirement to irrigate landscaping is suspended to the extent the requirement would otherwise be prohibited during any period in which the Governor, a
State agency, or unit of local government has imposed water conservation measures. The association may not fine or otherwise penalize an owner of land for violation of an irrigation requirement during a drought designated
under this subdivision, unless the covenant authorizes the fines or other penalties. This authorization must be written on the first page of the covenant in print that is in boldface type, capital letters, and no smaller
than the largest print used elsewhere in the declarations of covenants.

For purposes of this section, the term “landscaping” includes lawns, trees, shrubbery, and other ornamental or decorative plants.

History.
2008-143, s. 19(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(v).